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DIAGNOSTICS - SUB FUEL TANK SYSTEM

DI3MG-03

DTC 31 Sub Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Item Trouble Area
Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue: * Open or short in sub fuel pump circuit
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON * Sub fuel pump
31 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is high) « Fuel tank select relay
(b) Voltage of FPM1 terminal is low e Fuel pump relay
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is low « Circuit opening relay

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkvoltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU connector and body

ground.
ON Fuel Tank Changeover | PREPARATION:
Switch is ON (@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
|IZIIZII]IZII]IZIIZIIZIDDDDE%DDDDDDDD{EDDDDDDDDDE (¢) Push the fuel tank changeover switch ON.
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i CHECK:
\‘% M Measure voltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU con-

V nector and body ground, turn the ignition switch ON after 4 se-
I L FPM2 (+) | condsormore.
- A05862 %

Voltage:9 -14V

OK> Go to step 5.

@

2 [ Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI-49).
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NG% place fueltankselectrelay.
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3 | Check fuel pump relay (Marking: FUEL/PMP) (See page FI-46).

@

NG> Replace fuel pump relay.

4 [ Check circuit opening relay (Marking: C/OPN) (See page FI-45).

@

NG> Replace circuit opening relay.

5 | Check operation of sub fuel pump.

NG

PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

() Push the fuel tank changeover switch ON.

(d) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode.

CHECK:

Check the sub fuel pump operation, when it is operated by
hand-held tester.

OK:

Here a sub fuel pump operation noise
HINT:
If you have no hand-held tester, and then go to step 6.

0K> Go to step 7.

6 | Check sub fuel pump (See page FI-16).
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NG> Replace sub fuel pump.
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7 | Check for open or short in harness and connector between sub fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and fuel pump relay, fuel pump relay
and circuit opening relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace.

@

8 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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